apertium-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="skat/īties__vblex" c="? (ref) -īties">
      <e><p>          <l>īties</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>os</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āmies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āties</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>ījos</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ījāmies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ījies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ījāties</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ījās</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ījās</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p>          <l>īšos</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>īsimies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>īsies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>īsieties</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>īsities</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>īsies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>īsies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>



      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ieties</l><r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>


    <pardef n="spēlē/ties__vblex" c="? (ref) -ties">
      <e><p>          <l>ties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>jos</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jamies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jaties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jas</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jas</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>jos</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jāmies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jāties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jās</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jās</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>šos</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>simies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sities</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sieties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>jies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jieties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="slēp/ties__vblex" c="? (ref) -ties">
      <e><p>          <l>ties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>jos</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jamies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jaties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jas</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>jas</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>os</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āmies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>āties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ās</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p>          <l>šos</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>simies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sities</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sieties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ieties</l><r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="spēlēties"><par n="ne"/><i>spēlē</i><par n="spēlē/ties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klausīties"><par n="ne"/><i>klaus</i><par n="skat/īties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slēpties"><par n="ne"/><i>slēp</i><par n="slēp/ties__vblex"/></e>
